District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-1104.03

Revolving fund.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 5c
as added Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 104(b), 48 DCR 1888
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-185, § 2(g), 53 DCR 6712